src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-koaken_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - koaken: # Verb 'to cook / to boil' - full paradigm
     koaken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koake
     koaken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: koakst
     koaken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koakt
     koaken+V+Ind+Prs+Pl: [koaket, koaken]

     koaken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: koakde
     koaken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: koakdest
     koaken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: koakde
     koaken+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: koakden

     koaken+V+Inf:  koaken
     koaken+V+PrfPrc:  koaked
     koaken+V+PrsPrc:  koaken

     koaken+V+Imprt+Sg2:  koak
     koaken+V+Imprt+Pl2:  koaket
